Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB177.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 334A.020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Assisting in the practice of speech pathology" means the provision of certain
specific components of a speech or language service program provided by a speech-
language pathology assistant under the supervision and direction of an appropriately
qualified supervisor;
(2) "Audiologist" means one who is licensed to practice audiology. An audiologist may
describe himself or herself to the public by any title or description of services
incorporating the words "audiologist," "audiology," "audiological," "hearing
center," "hearing clinic," "hearing clinician," "hearing therapist," "audiometry,"
"audiometrist," "audiometrics," "otometry," "otometrist," "aural rehabilitationist,"
or "hearing conservationist";
(3) "Board" means the Kentucky Board of Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology;
(4) "Continuing professional education" in speech-language pathology and audiology
consists of planned learning experiences beyond a basic educational program
leading to a degree. These experiences are designed to promote knowledge, skills,
and attitudes of speech-language pathology and audiology practitioners to enable
them to provide professional services in their areas of training that are based on
current research and best practices;
(5) "Interim license" means a license issued by the board pursuant to KRS 334A.035 to
a person for the purpose of completing the [supervised ]postgraduate professional
experience required under that section prior to an application for licensure as a
speech-language pathologist or a speech-language pathology assistant;
(6) "Person" means any individual, organization, or corporate body, except that only
individuals can be licensed under this chapter;
Page 1 of 7
SB017710.100 - 939 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:00 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 177/GA
(7) "Practice of audiology" means the application of principles, methods, and
procedures of measurement, testing, appraisal, prediction, consultation, counseling,
and instruction related to hearing and disorders of hearing for the purpose of
modifying communicative disorders involving speech, language, auditory behavior,
or other aberrant behavior related to hearing loss; planning, directing, conducting,
or participating in identification and hearing conservation programs; and
habilitative and rehabilitative programs, including hearing aid recommendations
and evaluation, prescribing, ordering the use of, selling and fitting hearing
instruments, including the selling and fitting of both prescription hearing aids and
over-the-counter hearing aids, auditory training, or speech reading;
(8) "Practice of speech pathology" means the application of principles, methods, and
procedures for the measurement, testing, audiometric screening, identification,
appraisal, determination of prognosis, evaluation, consultation, remediation,
counseling, instruction, and research related to the development and disorders of
speech, voice, verbal and written language, cognition/communication, or oral and
pharyngeal sensorimotor competencies for the purpose of designing and
implementing programs for the amelioration of these disorders and conditions. Any
representation to the public by title or by description of services, methods, or
procedures for the evaluation, counseling, remediation, consultation, measurement,
testing, audiometric screening, identification, appraisal, instruction, and research of
persons diagnosed with conditions or disorders affecting speech, voice, verbal, and
written language, cognition/communication, or oral and pharyngeal sensorimotor
competencies shall be considered to be the practice of speech-language pathology;
(9) "Speech-language pathologist" means one who practices speech-language
pathology. A speech-language pathologist may describe himself or herself to the
public by any title or description of services incorporating the words "speech-
language pathologist," "speech-language pathology," "speech-language therapy,"
Page 2 of 7
SB017710.100 - 939 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:00 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 177/GA
"speech-language correction," "speech-language correctionist," "speech-language
therapist," "speech clinic," "speech clinician," "speech pathologist," "language
pathologist," "language pathology," "language therapist," "logopedics,"
"logopedist," "communicology," "communicologist," "aphasiologist," "voice
therapy," "voice therapist," "voice pathology," "voice pathologist," "phoniatrist,"
"communication disorders," or "verbal therapist";
(10) "Speech-language pathology assistant" means one who assists in the practice of
speech-language pathology only under the supervision and direction of an
appropriately qualified supervisor and only within the public school system in the
Commonwealth. Any speech-language pathology services provided without
appropriate supervision or outside the public school system shall be deemed to be
the unlicensed practice of speech-language pathology and shall subject the
offending party to penalties established in KRS 334A.990;
(11) "Supervisor" means a person who holds a Kentucky license as a speech-language
pathologist or who holds Education Professional Standards Board master's level
certification as a teacher of exceptional children in the areas of speech and
communication disorders as established by administrative regulation; and
(12) "Temporary license" means a license that may be issued by the board administrator
pursuant to KRS 334A.181 to any applicant who has met all the requirements for
permanent licensure in accordance with that section.
Section 2. KRS 334A.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A person who has a Master's degree in the area of speech-language pathology
or communication disorders, or is currently enrolled in a doctoral degree
program with emphasis in speech-language pathology or communication
disorders, or has substantive equivalent course work as defined by the board's
administrative regulations and who has completed supervised direct clinical
practicum with individuals presenting a variety of disorders of communication
Page 3 of 7
SB017710.100 - 939 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:00 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 177/GA
and swallowing, the experience being obtained with a training institution or in
one (1) of its cooperating programs, may[shall] apply for an interim license
during the time that person is completing postgraduate professional
experience deemed necessary by the board[. The postgraduate professional
experience shall be completed under the supervision of a speech-language
pathologist who holds a Kentucky license or certification by other accrediting
bodies, at the discretion of the board].
(b) A person with interim licensure shall make every effort to take and pass a
national examination in speech-language pathology approved by the board at
the time of the application for licensure. If unsuccessful with the examination,
the licensee shall submit documentation of the applicant's preparation to take
the national examination and continue to practice under supervision in
accordance with this section. The board shall promulgate an administrative
regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish the
documentation required under this paragraph.
(c) Upon completion of postgraduate professional experience deemed necessary
by the board, the speech-language pathologist shall make an application to the
board within thirty (30) days for permanent licensure, if all requirements have
been completed satisfactorily, or for renewal of the interim license at the
discretion of the board. Failure to do so shall result in forfeiture of the interim
license.
(d) An interim license shall not exceed a period of twenty-four (24) months
without board approval.
(2) (a) A person who has a baccalaureate degree in the area of speech-language
pathology or communication disorders as defined by administrative regulation
shall apply for an interim license as a speech-language pathology assistant
during the time that person is completing his or her professional experience as
Page 4 of 7
SB017710.100 - 939 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:00 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 177/GA
established by the board by administrative regulation. The postgraduate
professional experience shall be completed under the supervision of an
appropriately qualified supervisor.
(b) [Upon completion of the postgraduate professional experience, ]The speech-
language pathology assistant shall make immediate application to the board
within thirty (30) days for permanent licensure if all requirements have been
completed satisfactorily, or for renewal of the interim license at the discretion
of the board. Failure to do so shall result in forfeiture of the interim license.
(c) An interim license shall not exceed a period of twenty-four (24) months
without board approval.
(3) (a) A speech-language pathologist employed solely by the public schools in a
certified position who holds a teacher certification in communication
disorders issued by the Education Professional Standards Board shall be
exempt from holding a license issued by the board.
(b) A speech-language pathologist in a classified position who does not hold a
teacher certification in communication disorders issued by the Education
Professional Standards Board shall apply for and maintain appropriate
licensure.
(c) The public school speech-language pathologist shall determine from the local
school board how his or her position is categorized.
Section 3. KRS 334A.050 is amended to read as follows:
To be eligible for licensure by the board as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist,
the applicant must:
(1) Be a citizen of the United States or have declared his intention to become a citizen.
A statement by the applicant under oath that he is a citizen or that he intends to
apply for citizenship when he becomes eligible to make application shall be
sufficient proof of compliance with this subsection;
Page 5 of 7
SB017710.100 - 939 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:00 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 177/GA
(2) Show evidence of meeting the following professionally accepted academic and
practicum standards:
(a) Master's degree in the area of speech-language pathology or audiology or
substantive equivalent. The specific course work for this requirement is to be
determined by the board and delineated in the administrative regulations;
(b) Completion of supervised direct clinical practicum with individuals presenting
a variety of disorders of communication, the experience being obtained with
the training institution or in one (1) of its cooperating programs; and
(c) For applicants seeking to practice in accordance with KRS 334A.188,
completion of three (3) months of postgraduate professional experience as
deemed necessary by the board; and
(3) Pass the national examinations in speech-language pathology or audiology which
are approved by the American Speech and Hearing Association and in effect at the
time of application for licensure. Written examinations may be supplemented by
such oral examinations as the board shall determine. An applicant who fails his
examination may be reexamined at a subsequent examination upon payment of
another licensing fee.
Section 4. KRS 334A.183 is amended to read as follows:
(1) To be eligible for initial interim licensure by the board as a speech-language
pathologist, the applicant shall:
(a) Provide a certified university transcript conferring a master's degree or
doctorate degree in the area of speech-language pathology or communication
disorders, or substantive equivalent. The board shall promulgate
administrative regulations to specify the required course work; or
(b) Provide documentation of completion of degree requirements, including a
supervised direct clinical practicum with individuals presenting with a variety
of disorders of communications and swallowing. The experience shall be
Page 6 of 7
SB017710.100 - 939 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:00 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 177/GA
obtained with a training institution or in one (1) of its cooperating programs.
(2) To be eligible for initial licensure by the board as a speech-language pathologist,
the applicant shall:
(a) Provide a certified university transcript conferring a master's degree or
doctorate degree in the area of speech-language pathology or communication
disorders, or substantive equivalent. The board shall promulgate
administrative regulations to specify the required course work;
(b) [Provide documentation of completion of a postgraduate professional
experience approved by the board pursuant to administrative regulations
promulgated pursuant to this chapter; and
(c) ]Pass a national examination approved by the board at the time of the
application for licensure or provide documentation of national certification;
and
(c) If seeking to practice in accordance with KRS 334A.188, provide
documentation of completion of three (3) months of postgraduate
professional experience as set forth in an administrative regulation
promulgated by the board in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
Page 7 of 7
SB017710.100 - 939 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:00 PM GA